California statutes. Public Resources Code
(5) State and local actions that affect ocean waters or coastal or ocean resources should be conducted in a manner consistent with protection, conservation, and maintenance of healthy coastal and ocean ecosystems and restoration of degraded ocean ecosystems.

(6) Improving the quality of coastal waters and the health of fish in coastal waters should be a priority for the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 719, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

35515.

The Legislature finds and declares that the purpose of this division is to integrate and coordinate the state’s laws and institutions responsible for protecting and conserving ocean resources, including coastal waters and ocean ecosystems, to accomplish all of the following objectives:

(a) Provide a set of guiding principles for all state agencies to follow, consistent with existing law, in protecting the state’s coastal and ocean resources.

(b) Encourage cooperative management with federal agencies, to protect and conserve representative coastal and ocean habitats and the ecological processes that support those habitats.

(c) Improve coordination and management of state efforts to protect and conserve the ocean by establishing a cabinet level oversight body responsible for identifying more efficient methods of protecting the ocean at less cost to taxpayers.

(d) Use California’s private and charitable resources more effectively in developing ocean protection and conservation strategies.

(e) Provide for public access to the ocean and ocean resources, including to marine protected areas, for recreational use, and aesthetic, educational, and scientific purposes, consistent with the sustainable long-term conservation of those resources.

(f) Identify scientific research and planning that is useful for the protection and conservation of coastal waters and ocean ecosystems, and coordinate and assist state agencies in addressing those needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 372, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [35550. - 35550.]

35550.

Unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions govern this division:

(a) “Council” means the Ocean Protection Council established pursuant to Section 35600.

(b) “Fund” means the California Ocean Protection Trust Fund established pursuant to Section 35650.

(c) “Internationally accepted standards for sustainable seafood” means standards that meet all of the following criteria:(1) Meet or exceed the Guidelines for the Ecolabeling of Fish and Fishery Products from Marine Capture Fisheries promulgated by the Food and Agriculture Organization of the United Nations (FAO).

(2) Conform to all of the following principles:

(A) A fishery must be conducted in a manner that does not lead to overfishing or depletion of the exploited populations and, for those populations that are depleted, the fishery must be conducted in a manner that demonstrably leads to their recovery.

(B) Fishing operations should allow for the maintenance of the structure, productivity, function, and diversity of the ecosystem, including habitat and associated dependent and ecologically related species on which the fishery depends.

(C) The fishery is subject to an effective management system that respects local, national, and international laws and standards and incorporates institutional and operational frameworks that require use of the resource to be responsible and sustainable.

(d) “Public agency” means a city, county, city and
 county, district, or the state or any agency or department of the state.

(e) “Sustainable” and “sustainability” mean both of the following:

(1) Continuous replacement of resources, taking into account fluctuations in abundance and environmental variability.

(2) Securing the fullest possible range of present and long-term economic, social, and ecological benefits, while maintaining biological diversity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 279, Sec. 2.   (AB 1217)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Ocean Protection Council [35600. - 35625.]

35600.

(a) The Ocean Protection Council is established in state government. The council consists of the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, the Secretary for Environmental Protection, the Chair of the State Lands Commission, and two members of the public appointed by the Governor.

(b) The two public members shall each serve a term of four years, and may each be reappointed to one additional term. The public members of the board shall be appointed on the basis of their educational and professional qualifications and their general knowledge of, interest in, and experience in the protection and conservation of coastal waters and ocean ecosystems. One of the public members shall have a
 scientific professional background and experience in coastal and ocean ecosystems.

(c) Except as provided in this section, members of the council shall serve without compensation. A member shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties, and in addition shall be compensated at one hundred dollars ($100) for each day during which the member is engaged in the performance of official duties of the council. Payment for actual and necessary expenses shall be paid only to the extent that those expenses are not provided or payable by another public agency. The total number of days for which a member shall be compensated may not exceed 25 days in any one fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 356, Sec. 30.   (SB 96)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

35605.

The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall serve as the chairperson of the council, and the Secretary for Environmental Protection shall serve as the vice chairperson of the council. The Assistant Secretary for Coastal Matters at the Natural Resources Agency shall be designated as the Deputy Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency for Ocean and Coastal Policy, and the deputy secretary shall also serve as the executive director for the council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 356, Sec. 31.   (SB 96)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

35610.

One Member of the Senate, appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and one Member of the Assembly, appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, shall meet with the council as nonvoting, ex officio members.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 719, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

35612.

(a) The council’s meetings shall be open to the public.

(b) The council may sponsor conferences, symposia, and other public forums, to seek a broad range of public advice when establishing priorities for ocean resource protection, enhancement, and restoration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 719, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

35615.

The council shall do all of the following:

(a) (1) Coordinate activities of state agencies that are related to the protection and conservation of coastal waters and ocean ecosystems to improve the effectiveness of state efforts to protect ocean resources within existing fiscal limitations, consistent with Sections 35510 and 35515.

(2) Establish policies to coordinate the collection, evaluation, and sharing of scientific data related to coastal and ocean resources among agencies.

(3) (A) Establish a science advisory team of distinguished scientists to assist the council in meeting the purposes of this division. At the request of the council, the science advisory team may convene to identify, develop, and prioritize subjects and questions for research or investigation, and review and evaluate results of research or investigations to provide information for the council’s activities.

(B) The science advisory team shall include scientists from a range of disciplines that are a part of the council’s purview.

(C) The science advisory team shall provide an independent and timely analysis of reports and studies, identifying areas of scientific consensus or uncertainty, using the best available science by drawing on state, national, and international experts.

(D) Scientists selected as members of the science advisory team shall serve without compensation, except for reimbursement of expenses and subject to the terms of an existing contract with the state.

(4) Contract with the California Ocean Science Trust and other nonprofit organizations, ocean science institutes, academic institutions, or others that have experience in conducting the scientific and educational tasks that are required by the council.

(5) Transmit the results of research and investigations to state agencies to provide information for policy decisions.

(6) Identify and recommend to the Legislature changes in law needed to achieve the goals of this section.

(b) (1) Identify changes in federal law and policy necessary to achieve the goals of this division and to improve protection, conservation, and restoration of ocean ecosystems in federal and state waters off the state’s coast.

(2) Recommend to the Governor and the Legislature actions the state should take to encourage those changes in federal law and policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 191.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

35616.

(a) Subject to the availability of funding, the council shall develop and implement a coastal climate change adaptation, infrastructure, and readiness program to do all of the following:

(1) Recommend best practices and strategies to improve the climate change resiliency of the state’s coastal communities, infrastructure, and habitat.

(2) Coordinate with the State Coastal Conservancy, the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, the San Diego River Conservancy, the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, and other state entities as needed to develop criteria to prioritize the types of
 projects needed to improve climate change resiliency in the coastal zone.

(3) Collaborate with California State University, Long Beach and other universities, scientists, and nongovernmental organizations involved in climate change activities covering areas along the Pacific Rim to facilitate information sharing regarding coastal climate change adaptation, infrastructure, and readiness, including providing information to the Office of Planning and Research to be considered for inclusion into the clearinghouse established pursuant to Sections 71354 and 71360.

(b) The council shall use existing staff, resources, databases, and information contained in reports and other documents, including, but not limited to, the “Safeguarding California Plan: 2018 Update” and the
 Office of Planning and Research Integrated Climate Adaptation and Resiliency Program, to develop and implement the program required under subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 374, Sec. 3.   (SB 576)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

35617.

(a) The Ocean Protection Council shall develop and implement a voluntary sustainable seafood promotion program for the state.

(b) The program shall consist of all of the following:

(1) A protocol to guide entities on how to be independently certified to internationally accepted standards for sustainable seafood. The protocol and any substantive amendments or revisions to the protocol shall be developed in a transparent process and adopted by the council in a public meeting. The council shall identify in a public document that the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 35550 have been met.

(2) (A) A marketing assistance program for seafood caught in California that is independently certified to internationally accepted standards for sustainable seafood. The council shall consult with the Department of Food and Agriculture in implementing this paragraph.

(B) Consistent with subparagraph (A), the marketing assistance program shall consist of competitive grants and loans for discrete and limited activities to benefit participants in the fishing industry in California.

(3) A competitive grant and loan program, only in years in which funds are appropriated by the Legislature to the California Ocean Protection Trust Fund, for eligible entities, including, but not limited to, fishery groups and associations, for the purpose of assisting California fisheries in qualifying for certification to internationally accepted standards for
 sustainable seafood. This program may be implemented in coordination with other state and private programs to maximize its effectiveness.

(4) The design of a label or labels that may be used exclusively to identify seafood caught in California that is certified to internationally accepted standards as sustainable seafood.

(c) Seafood produced through aquaculture or fish farming shall not be certified as sustainable under this division until nationally or internationally accepted sustainability standards have been developed and implemented.

(d) The program, each component of the program, and actions taken by the council to implement the program are based upon voluntary actions initiated by entities pursuant to this section and are not regulations as defined in Section 11342.600 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 273, Sec. 1.   (AB 337)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

35620.

(a) Consistent with this chapter, and subject to the availability of funding, the council shall support state agencies’ use and sharing of scientific and geospatial information for coastal- and ocean-relevant decisionmaking, including marine spatial planning, by taking all of the following actions:

(1) Assess the needs of California’s public agencies with respect to their abilities to gather, manage, use, and share information and decision-support tools relevant to ecosystem-based management in the coastal and ocean environment.

(2) Subject to a determination of need in paragraph (1) and in consultation with the relevant coastal or ocean
 management agency, increase the amount of baseline scientific and geospatial information that is available to public agencies in a publicly accessible, electronic, and geospatial format with respect to the following aspects of coastal and ocean ecosystems:

(A) Ecosystem health, structure, functioning, productivity, resilience, and vulnerability to threats.

(B) The effects of climate change.

(C) The cumulative effects of human-caused and natural sources of stress.

(D) Existing and predicted patterns of human activities, including activities that present conflicting or compatible demands on coastal and ocean ecosystems or those that require the use
 of a precautionary approach.

(E) Social, economic, and cultural values, including the value of coastal and ocean ecosystems for providing ecosystem services.

(F) Distinguishing ecological characteristics, including habitat heterogeneity, species abundance, and biodiversity.

(G) Other physical, biological, economic, social, and cultural information that the council determines is relevant to marine spatial planning.

(3) Support public agencies’ collaborative management and use of scientific and geospatial information relevant to ecosystem-based management.

(4) Help identify decision-support tools relevant to ecosystem-based management, and, where appropriate, support the adaptation of those
 tools or the creation of new tools to serve the state’s needs.

 (b) Subject to available funding, and consistent with their individual mandates, each agency, board, department, or commission of the state with ocean or coastal management interests or regulatory authority shall cooperate with the council to achieve all of the goals described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 544, Sec. 2.   (AB 2125)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

35621.

Consistent with the council’s authority and responsibility under this chapter to coordinate activities of state agencies with ocean or coastal management interests or regulatory authority, to improve the effectiveness of state efforts to protect ocean resources, and to establish policies to coordinate the collection and sharing of scientific data related to coastal and ocean resources among agencies, the council may award grants, enter into interagency agreements, and provide assistance to public agencies and nonprofit organizations to support this effort, including grants to improve geospatial data collection, interagency data sharing and collaboration, and tools for visualizing and analyzing these data. In allocating grants and assistance, the council shall give preference to public
 agencies that are meeting the goals described in Section 35620.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 544, Sec. 3.   (AB 2125)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

35625.

(a) Under the direction of the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, the council shall administer its affairs, and provide the staff services that the council needs to carry out this division, including, but not limited to, both of the following:

(1) Administering grants and expenditures authorized by the council from the fund or other sources, including, but not limited to, block grants from other state boards, commissions, or departments.

(2) Arranging meetings, agendas, and other administrative functions in support of the council.

(b) The
 Legislature may make appropriations to be used for the purposes of this division directly to the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, for expenditures authorized by the council. If an expenditure has been approved by the council for the purposes of this division, approval of the secretary is not required, except in the case of block grants provided by the council to be administered by the secretary.

(c) Any bond funds received by the State Coastal Conservancy, on or before July 1, 2013, which authorized the use of funds for council programs, shall be transferred to the Natural Resources Agency for use for those programs.

(d) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that, on the effective date of the act adding this subdivision during the 2013–14 Regular Session, various contracts and grants will be pending or remain subject to management and control by
 the State Coastal Conservancy on behalf of the council. On and after that date, the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency is hereby designated as the legal successor to the State Coastal Conservancy, and the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall assume management and control of those contracts and grants and shall have all of the same powers and duties as the State Coastal Conservancy.

(2) In addition to the powers and duties described in paragraph (1), on and after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision during the 2013–14 Regular Session, the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall have the following powers and duties on behalf of the council:

(A) The management of all contracts and grants, including the completion, modification, and cancellation of those contracts and grants in accordance with existing law.

(B) The negotiation and settlement of claims relating to contracts and grants.

(C) Responsibility for the completion, maintenance, and disposal of any records relating to the transfer of responsibilities from the State Coastal Conservancy to the Natural Resources Agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 356, Sec. 32.   (SB 96)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.1. Ocean Acidification and Hypoxia Mitigation [35630. - 35632.]

35630.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Ocean acidification and hypoxia, an abnormal deficiency of oxygen in marine environments, are two major threats to ocean and coastal ecosystems globally, and west coast states are particularly vulnerable, according to the April 2016 findings of the West Coast Ocean Acidification and Hypoxia Science Panel.

(b) The West Coast Ocean Acidification and Hypoxia Science Panel was a binational collaboration of leading scientists from California, Oregon, Washington, and British Columbia that was convened at the request of the council and the California Ocean Science Trust. The West Coast Ocean Acidification and Hypoxia Science Panel’s executive
 summary report outlines findings, recommendations, and actions to address ocean acidification and hypoxia.

(c) Ocean acidification is caused primarily by global carbon dioxide emissions. Local carbon dioxide emissions and local nutrient inputs can intensify the effects of ocean acidification.

(d) The West Coast Ocean Acidification and Hypoxia Science Panel recommends that California and other west coast states actively employ strategies that address local factors that can reduce ocean acidification and hypoxia exposure, including protecting and restoring critical coastal and aquatic habitats.

(e) Eelgrass ecosystems are among the most diverse and productive ecosystems in the world, with particular importance to farmed shellfish aquaculture and other forms of sustainable aquaculture and to commercially and
 recreationally valuable species, including shellfish, crabs, finfish, waterfowl, and shorebirds.

(f) Eelgrass protection and restoration efforts help promote a healthier ocean for ecosystems and industry.

(g) Since the 1850s, 90 percent of California’s eelgrass acreage has been destroyed, and the remaining 10 percent is continuously exposed to multiple stressors and threats.

(h) Scientific research has shown that eelgrass habitat provides multiple benefits, including the following:

(1) Providing essential habitat for salmon, groundfish, and Pacific herring, providing Dungeness crab nurseries, and supporting commercial fisheries important to California’s coastal economy.

(2) Improving water
 quality by filtering polluted runoff and by absorbing excess nutrients.

(3) Helping to mitigate hypoxia.

(4) Sequestering carbon in the underlying sediments.

(5) Protecting the shoreline from erosion by absorbing wave energy and helping to mitigate the impacts of sea level rise.

(i) Advancing the protection and restoration of eelgrass beds in California’s coastal environments, based on scientific and evidence-based approaches, is a critical strategy in enhancing California’s ability to cope with ocean acidification and hypoxia.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 846, Sec. 1.   (SB 1363)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35631.

(a) Subject to the availability of funding, the council may develop an ocean acidification and hypoxia science task force to ensure that decisionmaking is supported by the best available science.

(b) Subject to the availability of funding, the council shall do both of the following:

(1) Take actions to address ocean acidification and hypoxia, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Implement measures to facilitate climate change adaptation in the ocean, consistent with subdivision (c) of Section 71154.

(B) Develop, refine, and integrate predictive models that identify the relative contributions of global and local drivers of ocean acidification and hypoxia in California waters.

(C) Work with other agencies to coordinate and ensure that criteria and standards for coastal water health to address ocean acidification and hypoxia are developed and informed by the best available science.

(D) Develop a comprehensive inventory of areas in California vulnerable to ocean acidification and hypoxia.

(E) Facilitate agreements with other national, state, and regional governments and private entities to establish and advance joint priorities for ocean acidification and hypoxia research.

(F) In coordination with relevant federal, state, and academic entities, identify gaps between the monitoring of ocean acidification and hypoxia and management needs, and the actions necessary to address these gaps. 

(2) Beginning January 1, 2018, and annually thereafter, at its first meeting of the year, adopt recommendations for further actions that may be taken to address ocean acidification and hypoxia.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 352, Sec. 2.   (AB 2139)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35632.

(a) To the extent funds are available from bonds or other sources, the council, in consultation with the State Coastal Conservancy and other relevant entities, shall establish and administer the Ocean Acidification and Hypoxia Reduction Program for the purpose of achieving the following goals:

(1) Developing demonstration projects to research how important environmental and ecological factors interact across space and time to influence how geographically dispersed eelgrass beds function for carbon dioxide removal and hypoxia reduction.

(2) Generating an inventory of locations where conservation or restoration of aquatic habitats, including eelgrass, can be successfully applied
 to mitigate ocean acidification and hypoxia.

(3) Incorporating consideration of carbon dioxide removal for eelgrass restoration projects during the habitat restoration planning process in order to fully account for the benefits of long-term carbon storage of habitat restoration in addition to the habitat value.

(4) Supporting science, monitoring, and coordination to ensure that ocean and coastal policy and management in California reflect best readily available science on strategies to reduce ocean acidification and hypoxia to implement this section.

(b) In advancing approaches in the program to remove carbon dioxide from seawater, the council shall consider approaches that provide multiple cobenefits, including, but not limited to, providing essential fish and bird habitat, improving water quality, and mitigating
 the impacts of sea level rise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 846, Sec. 1.   (SB 1363)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.2. Microplastic Materials [35635. - 35635.]

35635.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Through the adoption of the California Ocean Litter Prevention Strategy, the council has led the development of long-term policies to address marine debris.

(2) Although substantial scientific research on microplastics exists, further research will complement and support continuing efforts to reduce microplastic pollution.

(3) In addition to the development of a long-term Statewide Microplastics Strategy, early actions to prevent and reduce known impacts of microplastics to the marine environment should be pursued.

(4) This chapter is not intended to preclude the Legislature from enacting legislation to reduce microplastic pollution either before or after the Statewide Microplastics Strategy is adopted and implemented.

(b) To the extent that funds are available from bonds or other sources, including from federal, state, academic, or other public or private entities, on or before December 31, 2024, the council shall adopt and implement a Statewide Microplastics Strategy related to microplastic materials that pose an emerging concern for ocean health. The council shall work with the State Water Resources Control Board, the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, and other interested entities in the development of the Statewide Microplastics Strategy. The goal of the Statewide Microplastics Strategy shall be to increase the understanding of the scale and risks of microplastic materials
 on the marine environment and identify proposed solutions to address the impacts of microplastic materials, to the extent feasible.

(c) The council, in collaboration with the State Water Resources Control Board, the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, and other interested entities, may enter into one or more contracts with marine research institutes in the state, including those associated with the University of California, the California State University, Stanford University, the California Ocean Science Trust, and other academic and research institutions that have demonstrated expertise relating to the effects of microplastic materials on ocean health, for the provision of research services that would contribute directly to the development of the Statewide Microplastics Strategy.

(d) The Statewide Microplastics Strategy shall include, but is not limited to, all of
 the following components:

(1) The development of a comprehensive prioritized research plan that includes research that will support the development of risk assessments for microplastics in the marine environment habitat types of California.

(2) The development of standardized methods for sampling, detecting, and characterizing microplastics.

(3) The characterization of ambient concentrations of microplastics in the marine environment and an assessment of the associated environmental impacts, by microplastic particle age, size, shape, type, and location.

(4) An investigation of the sources and relative importance of pathways associated with the environmental impacts of microplastics determined to be significant pursuant to paragraph (3).

(5) The development of a risk assessment framework for microplastics, based on the best available information on exposure of microplastics to organisms, including humans, through pathways that impact the marine environment.

(6) Research on approaches for reducing the introduction of microplastics into the marine environment from significant pathways of exposure, with an emphasis on the sizes, shapes, and types of microplastics that are associated with significant environmental impacts.

(7) Use of the risk assessment framework developed pursuant to paragraph (5) to evaluate options, including source reduction and product stewardship techniques, barriers, costs, and benefits.

(8) Recommendations for policy changes, including statutory changes, or additional
 research that may be needed.

(e) The council may include the Statewide Microplastics Strategy within the council’s California Ocean Litter Prevention Strategy: Addressing Marine Debris from Source to Sea.

(f) In developing and implementing the Statewide Microplastics Strategy, the council may utilize existing information and leverage ongoing efforts, where possible.

(g) (1) On or before December 31, 2021, subject to the availability of funding, the council shall submit the Statewide Microplastics Strategy to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code. The council may at that time also submit recommended policy changes, including statutory changes, that may be needed to implement the Statewide Microplastics Strategy.

(2) On or before December 31, 2025, subject to the availability of funding, the council shall report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on the implementation of the Statewide Microplastics Strategy and the council’s findings pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (d) and shall make recommendations to the Legislature pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (d).

(3) The reports required pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be complementary to, and not preclude appropriate implementation of, the individual components of the council’s California Ocean Litter Prevention Strategy: Addressing Marine Debris from Source to Sea.

(4) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the requirement for submitting the Statewide Microplastics Strategy and any recommended policy changes imposed by paragraph (1)
 is inoperative on December 31, 2025, and the requirement for submitting a report imposed by paragraph (2) is inoperative on December 31, 2029.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 609, Sec. 1.   (SB 1263)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.3. Protecting Blue Whales and Blue Skies Program [35640. - 35641.]

35640.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) California’s seaports are North America’s primary intermodal gateway to Asia and Transpacific trade. Maritime industry activities at California’s public seaports are responsible for employing more than 500,000 people in the state. Nationwide, more than 2,000,000 jobs are linked to maritime industry business conducted at California’s public seaports, contributing to California having the largest state economy in the United States.

(b) Every year, the oceangoing vessels make thousands of transits along the California coast, with an estimated 162 tons per day of nitrogen
 oxides, an ozone precursor, being emitted along the coast. These emissions negatively affect the public health of coastal communities and contribute to causing some areas of the coast to be in nonattainment with the national ambient air quality standards for ozone and particulate matter.

(c) Since 2014, the Santa Barbara County Air Pollution Control District, the Ventura County Air Pollution Control District, the Bay Area Air Quality Management District, the Monterey Bay Air Resources District, and the San Luis Obispo County Air Pollution Control District, with the federal Office of National Marine Sanctuaries, marine sanctuary foundations, and environmental groups, have administered and promoted the Protecting Blue Whales and Blue Skies Program, a voluntary vessel speed reduction program off the San Francisco Bay, central coast, and south
 coast to encourage transit speeds of 10 knots or less to reduce air pollution, the risk of harmful whale strikes, and the level of ocean noise.

(d) Since its inception through 2024, the Protecting Blue Whales and Blue Skies Program has provided small incentives and publicity to program participants and has achieved 1,596,008 slow speed miles, a reduction of 5,903 tons of nitrogen oxides, a reduction of 204,661 metric tons of regional greenhouse gas emissions, a reduction of more than 35 tons of toxic diesel particulate matter, and an estimated 50 percent decreased risk of whale strikes during prime migration season in the affected coastal areas.

(e) This highly cost-effective voluntary pollution reduction program benefits public health, protects the marine ecosystem, and
 showcases the beneficial partnership between shipping companies, public health agencies, marine sanctuaries, and environmental organizations.

(f) Expansion of the vessel speed reduction program to other areas of the California coast, including the San Diego coast and the North Coast, would yield additional public health and ecosystem benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 606, Sec. 1.   (AB 14)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

35641.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that expansion of the Protecting Blue Whales and Blue Skies Program by local air pollution control districts and air quality management districts and stakeholders is a critical strategy in advancing protection of marine mammals through partnerships that also support the maritime industry and local public health.

(b) Subject to the availability of funding, the council shall participate, as a stakeholder and in an advisory capacity, in the Protecting Blue Whales and Blue Skies Program with air pollution control districts and air quality management districts along the coast and other stakeholders, including the federal
 Office of National Marine Sanctuaries, the United States Environmental Protection Agency, the United States Navy, the United States Coast Guard, and the maritime industry, to support, in an advisory capacity, coastal air districts in their efforts to implement a statewide voluntary vessel speed reduction and sustainable shipping program for the California coast in order to reduce air pollution, the risk of fatal vessel strikes on whales, and harmful underwater acoustic impacts.

(c) Expansion of the existing Protecting Blue Whales and Blue Skies Program by local air pollution control districts and air quality management districts shall be a single unified program, and may include all of the following components developed in a manner that is consistent with how the program components were developed for the Protecting Blue Whales and Blue Skies
 Program:

(1) A marketing program to engage cargo owners and other commercial interests to promote voluntary vessel speed reduction and sustainable shipping, and an acknowledgment of the program’s participants.

(2) Data collection on ship speeds along the California coast in order to analyze the program for future refinement, expansion, or both.

(3) Data collection on underwater acoustic impacts or fatal vessel strikes on whales, to the extent data is available.

(4) Data collection on the regional air quality impacts on the coast and impacts to air quality in coastal disadvantaged communities from oceangoing vessel traffic, as collected and provided by
 the regional air pollution control districts and air quality management districts.

(5) Incentives to program participants based on a percentage of distance traveled by a participating vessel at a reduced speed, including speed zones at 10 knots or less, to the extent that local or federal funding is available.

(6) Development of vessel speed reduction zones along the coast that take into account navigational safety, protected marine mammal migration and breeding seasons, federal marine sanctuaries and state marine protected areas, shipping lanes, and any other relevant variables.

(7) Seasonality of the program.

(8) Description of covered vessels.

(d) The program shall supplement, work in conjunction with, and not preclude any other existing port-related vessel speed reduction
 programs.

(e) The program shall only apply to vessels that are 300 gross tons or greater.

(f) (1) On or before December 31, 2029, the participating air pollution control districts and air quality management districts shall submit a report to the Legislature regarding the implementation of the program.

(2) The report required in paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance
 with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(3) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the requirement for submitting a report imposed by paragraph (1) is inoperative on December 31, 2033.

(g) The program and each component of the program are based upon voluntary actions initiated by entities pursuant to this section and are not regulations as defined in Section 11342.600 of the
 Government Code, and shall not be implemented in a way that conflicts with federal law and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 606, Sec. 1.   (AB 14)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. California Ocean Protection Trust Fund [35650. - 35651.]

35650.

(a) The California Ocean Protection Trust Fund is established in the State Treasury.

(b) Moneys deposited in the fund may be expended, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for both of the following:

(1) Projects and activities authorized by the council consistent with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 35600).

(2) Upon authorization by the council, for grants or loans to public agencies, nonprofit corporations, or private entities for, or direct expenditures on, projects or activities that do one or more of the following:

(A) Eliminate or reduce threats to coastal and ocean ecosystems, habitats, and species.
